epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/en_GB.xml
		1so2m
		soma5to
		3some.
		so5mete
		so3mo
		s2ona
		son5at
		s4one
		son5or
		s2o2p
		4sor3ie
		5sorio
		sor4it
		s5oriz
		sor3o
		s3ory
		sos4
		4sose
		so5th
		3sou
		sov5e
		so3vi
		spast4
		spens5a
		4speo
		3sperm
		s5pero
		spers5a
		sph2
		s3pha
		3spher
		spic5ul
		s2pid
		sp5id.
		s5pier
		spil4l
		s2pin
		sp3ing
		spi5ni
		spital5
		s1pl
		sple2
		s4ply
		s2po
		5spom
		spon5gi
		3spons
		3spoon
		spru5d
		s4py
		s1r
		sre2
		sreg5
		srep5u
		sre4s
		4ss
		s1sa
		s5sam2
		s1sel
		s5seng
		s3sent
		ssent5er
		ss3er.
		s5seri
		ss3ers
		s5seu
		ssev3
		s3sia
		s1sic
		s1sif
		ss1in
		ss4in.
		s4sine
		ss4is.
		s3s2it
		ss4ivi
		ss5li
		ss3m
		s4sn
		s1so
		ssol3u
		ssolu4b
		s4sore
		ssor5ial
		ss5po
		s1su
		ss3w
		st2
		4st.
		stab2
		sta3bi
		4stak
		s4tale
		stant5iv
		s3tas.
		5static
		st3c
		ste2
		ste5ar
		ste5at
		s4teb
		s4tec
		4s1ted
		s4tedl
		s4tedn
		4stere
		ster4ia
		s4tern.
		s3tero
		st5est
		s1th
		s4tha
		s4thu
		s3ti3a
		3stick
		s3ticu
		stil5ler
		s4tily
		st3ing
		5s4tir
		s5tiz
		4stl
		st3ler
		st3li
		s4toe
		3ston
		stone3
		ston4ie
		s5torat
		stor5ian
		s4tose
		s2tou
		s4tray
		stre4
		strep3
		3struc
		stru5d
		2st3s
		s1tu
		s4tud
		stu4m
		stur4e
		4stw
		s4ty
		1styl
		4su.
		su5an
		su4b1
		subt2
		suct4
		sud4a
		su3et
		suf3f
		sug3
		3sui
		sui5c
		su5ing
		1s2ul
		s4u2m
		sum3i
		sun4a
		su5pe
		su3pin
		supra3
		sur4as
		sur3c
		s4urg
		sur3pl
		su5su
		su5z
		2s3v
		svers5a
		sves4
		svest5i
		sw2
		5swee
		swell5i
		4swered
		2swo
		s2y
		4sy.
		sy4bi
		sy1c
		sy4ce
		sy4chr
		sy4d
		1syl
		3syn
		syn5e
		sy5pho
		syr5i
		2ta.
		2tab
		ta5blem
		3tabli
		t2abo
		ta3bol
		ta4bou
		t4a3ce
		ta5chom
		ta3chy
		ta4cid
		t5ade
		tad4i
		5t2adj
		ta5dor
		tad2r
		tae5n
		taf4
		tage5o
		ta5gog
		3tagr
		3tah
		1tai
		3tail
		2tair
		t4ais
		1tak
		tal2c
		tal5ent
		ta5lep
		t4alia
		t4alin
		tal4l3a
		5tallu
		t2alo4
		ta3ly
		tam5ari
		5ta3met
		tamorph5
		tan5at
		tand5er
		t4ane
		5tanel
		tan5ie
		t5aniz
		tant5an
		ta4pa
		1tard
		tar5ia.
		tark5i
		tar3n
		3tarr
		tas3i
		t3asm
		5tass
		tas4t
		ta3sta
		tast5i4c
		t4ateu
		3tatis
		t4ato.
		tat4ou
		tat4r
		tat3ut
		tau3to
		t5awa
		tawn4
		t4ax
		4t3b
		2tc2
		t1ca
		tcas4
		tch5ett
		tch5u
		4t1d4
		4te.
		te5cha
		5techn
		te3cr
		t4ed
		te5d2a
		4tedd
		4tedo
		4teei
		te2g
		5tegic
		t3ego
		teg1r
		teg3u
		tei4
		te2l
		4teled
		tel5iz
		1tell
		4te3lo
		3tels
		tem3a
		4teme
		te5mon
		ten4ag
		4tenar
		4tene
		t5enm
		5tenna
		4teno
		te5nog
		tent4a
		te2o
		teo5l
		2tep
		te3pe
		tep5i
		tera4c
		t4erag
		t4erato
		3ter3b
		5terd
		2tere4
		ter3eb
		ter5ec
		5terel
		te3reo
		3teres4
		1teri
		ter3ia
		ter5id
		ter5if
		t4erin
		ter5iorit
		ter3it
		ter5k
		5ternit
		ter5no
		3terr
		2t2es
		4tes.
		tesi4
		t3esq
		t3ess.
		t5esses
		tes4t
		test3a
		5teste
		test5er
		test5in
		test5or
		tes5tu
		teti4
		tet1r
		tetr5o
		tew3ar
		3tex
		2t3f
		t3g
		2th.
		tha4
		th5al.
		thal3m
		4the.
		4thea
		th5eas
		4thed
		1thei
		3theo
		theo3l
		t4her
		5therap
		th5erc
		t5herd
		4thered
		th3ern
		th3ery
		4thi.
		t5hill
		3think
		5th4io
		th4is.
		th5lo
		2thm2
		th4mi
		th3oli
		4t5hoo
		4thopt
		4thores
		3thot
		5thoug
		1th2r
		2ths
		5thur
		5thym
		3thyr
		thys4
		4ti.
		1ti2a
		ti3ab
		2t3ib
		5ti5bu
		t1ic
		t3ic.
		tic5as
		t2ici
		tici5ar
		3ti3cin
		t4icity
		ti3col
		tic1u
		4ticule
		t3id.
		t4ida
		3tidi
		ti3die
		t5ids
		3ti2en
		1tif2
		ti3fe
		4tiff
		4tific.
		3tigi
		tigi5o
		4tigm
		5tigu
		ti4ka
		ti4let
		5tilin
		t4ill
		til4l5ag
		t4ilt
		1tim
		tim1a
		5timet4
		t1in
		5ti5nad
		4tined
		tin3et
		ting5ing
		3tinn
		4tins
		t4int
		tin4te
		tin5ted
		tint5er
		tin3ue
		1tio
		ti3oc
		tiol3a
		ti5omo
		4tionem
		1tip
		ti5plex
		ti3pli
		ti4q
		ti5qua
		t3iris
		2t1is
		3tisan
		tis4c
		tish5i
		3tiss
		tis2t
		5t4iste
		t4istr
		ti5t4an
		tith4e
		tit5il
		t3itis
		3titl
		ti3tra
		3tiu
		2t1iv
		tiv5all
		t3ive
		tiv3is
		2tl
		t1la
		tlant4
		5tleb
		5tledr
		3tlef
		3tlem
		5tlen
		5tletr
		5tlew
		t1li
		tlin4
		4t3m
		tmet2
		tmo4t5
		2t3n2
		t4nere
		2to.
		toas4
		to1b
		4tocc
		tode5c
		tod4i
		to5do
		3toe
		1tog
		2t3oid
		5tok
		4toled
		tol4l
		tolu5
		to5ly
		tom3ac
		toma4n
		tomat5ol
		tom4b
		to4mog
		tom5os
		ton4e
		ton5ea
		3tonn
		ton3s
		top4e
		to5pia
		to4pos
		t1or
		to5rad
		4tore
		tor5er
		tori4as
		tor5oi
		tor5p
		tor4q
		3tos.
		to3s4p
		tos4t
		to5str
		to5talis
		to5taliz
		to3tem
		tot5u
		tou4f
		5tour
		t3ous
		4tov
		to3war
		t3p
		tr2
		tra4co
		4tradd
		4traist
		tra5q
		trarch4
		tra5ven
		tra5vers
		trav5est
		3tray
		4tre.
		4tred
		tre4mo
		tren4
		trend5i
		tre5pr
		tres4s
		4trew
		t5ricl
		3tricu
		t2rie
		tri5fli
		trifu5ga
		2tril
		tri3li
		tri3me
		t2rit
		4trix
		t4rod
		tro5f
		5troop
		tro4pha
		tro3sp
		t2rot
		t5roto
		tro1v
		3troy
		t4ruc
		tru3i
		2t4ry
		trys4
		4t1s
		t2sc
		ts4h
		ts2i
		t4sil
		tstay4
		2t1t4
		tta4
		t3tab
		t5tan
		t5tas
		t3ted
		t4tere
		t5terer
		t5test
		t3ti
		tti3tu
		ttitud4
		ttitu5di
		t3tler
		t3tli
		t5toi
		t5tor
		t3tos
		tt5s
		t4tupe
		t2ty
		4tu.
		tu1a
		tu4al5li
		tuari4
		tu4bin
		tu5bu
		tu5den
		tud5ie
		tu5en
		4tuf
		tu1i
		tu4is
		2tum.
		3tumi
		4tums
		3tun
		tun4a
		tu4ne
		tun5it
		tup5let
		tup5lic
		tu5rac
		t4uran
		turb3a
		tur4d
		turf5i
		5turit
		tur4n
		5tur5o
		1tut
		4tut4iv
		t1w
		t3wa4
		t2wi
		twi5li
		t3wit
		t3wo
		twon4
		4ty.
		ty4a
		5tych
		ty4let
		tyl5i
		ty5mi
		1typ
		3type
		1tyr1
		2tz2
		t5zia
		t5zie
		2ua2
		ua3ci
		u2ag
		ua5h
		u1al
		ua5lu
		uan4o
		uant5is
		uant5it
		uar3a
		uar2d
		uar3i
		uari4n
		uar5ters
		uar4t5i
		ua5tern
		uba4
		ub5bly
		u1b2i
		u4bicu
		ub3lin
		ub5lo
		ub3ra
		4uc
		u1c2a
		uccen5
		u4cend
		u4ch
		u5chr
		uc3l
		u4com
		uco5t
		uc2tr
		uc3ub
		uc5ul
		u5cum
		u5dac
		ud1al
		ud4e
		ud5ep
		u4der
		udev4
		ud4g
		udi4cin
		ud3ied
		u5dinis
		udi3o
		u5ditio
		u2do
		u5doi
		ud5on
		u5dor
		ueb4
		u4ed
		uen4o
		uen4ter
		uer3a
		ues4s
		uest5rat
		ues5tri
		ue4t
		uf2
		3ufa
		u3fl
		u4fo
		uft4
		uga4c
		ug5lif
		ug2ni
		u4go
		ug3ul
		ug3ura
		uhem3
		2ui2
		ui3al
		u2ic
		uicent5
		uid5o
		uil4a
		uild5er
		ui3lib
		uil4t
		uinc5u
		uin4s
		uint4
		uin4ta
		ui5pr
		uis3er
		uis4t
		uisti4
		uit5er
		ui5val5
		ui3vo
		u2iz
		4ul.
		u1la
		u4lab
		4ulac
		ul5ard
		u5lat
		ul4bo
		ul3ca
		ul4ch
		5ulche
		5ulchre
		4ulea
		u5lee
		u1len4
		4ulenci
		u5lent
		ulet4
		ul4ev
		ul2fa
		ul2i
		ul4ia
		u3line
		ul3ing
		ul5ish
		u5liti
		u5lity
		4ull
		ul4lat
		ul4l5ib
		ul4lis
		ul4lit
		ul3m
		u1lo
		u5lom
		ulph3i
		ulph3o
		ulp5ing
		ul4po
		2uls
		ul3sif
		u1lu
		ul1v4
		u1ma
		um3am
		umar4
		u5mas
		um4bar.
		um2bi
		umen4t
		u1mi
		u4mic
		u2m5if
		umi4fy
		umi5lia
		umin4ar
		u4mined
		u4m3ing
		u4mora
		u4mos
		um2p
		um4pa
		ump3er
		ump5li
		umpt4
		ump5te
		u1mu
		umu4lo
		un1
		u4n3a4
		un5ab
		unabu4
		un4ae
		un4as.
		un2ce
		un4dal
		un3ded
		unde4t
		undeter5m
		undi4c
		un4die
		un3do
		un4dus
		u3n2er
		unho5li
		un2i
		u1nic
		un4ie
		un3in
		un4ine
		uni5p
		uni3so
		un3ist
		uni1v
		un3iz
		unk5eri
		un5ket
		un3kn
		2unn
		un4nag
		un5o
		un5r
		un3s4
		un5sh
		un2ti
		until4
		unu4
		un3us
		uo3de
		uodent4
		u5oros
		u3os
		uo5tatio
		u1ou
		2up
		u1pat
		u1pe
		u5pee
		uper3
		u1ph
		u5pid
		up3ing
		u4po
		u5pol
		u2pr
		upre4
		u5quet
		u4r
		ur1a
		4ura.
		ura4ci
		4urae
		ura2g
		4uranti
		uras5
		urb5ing
		ur2c
		urc3a
		ur5den.
		ur5deni
		ur5die
		ur4du
		ur3ea
		ur5ee
		ur1er
		ur3ers
		ur1e2t
		ur3ett
		ur2f
		ur3fa
		ur1i
		u5ri5cu
		ur4ie.
		ur5ifie
		uril4
		ur4ili
		ur5ion
		uri4os.
		url5er
		ur5lie
		url5ing
		ur1m4
		urn3al
		urn3er
		urn5s
		ur1o
		uro4d
		ur5o4m
		ur5ot
		uroti4
		urpen5t
		urph4
		ur2s
		urs5al
		urs5er
		ur3sh
		urs3or
		ur5ta
		ur1te
		ur5tes
		urth2
		ur3the
		urti4
		ur1u
		ur4va
		u3sad
		us3ag
		us3al
		us4ap
		us3at
		2usc
		us4can
		ush5a
		us5ian
		usil5
		u4s1in
		usk5er
		us1p
		us4pa
		uss4e
		4ust
		us3tac
		us5tan
		ust4ic
		us5tici
		ust5ig
		ust3il
		us1to4
		us1tr
		us4tre
		usur4e
		us5uri
		u3tane
		utch4e
		ut5eni
		u5teo
		u4tere
		ut2i
		u3tie
		ut3ing
		u5tini
		u3tio
		ut5ism
		ut3ist
		5u5tiz
		ut3le
		utli4
		ut2o
		u4to5s
		u4t1ra
		uts2
		ut5sm
		ut4tone
		u3tu
		u4tul
		uu4
		uv2
		u4va
		uve2
		uven3
		uv5eri
		u5vin
		ux2o
		uy4a
		uy5er
		4va.
		2v3ab
		5vac
		va1ca
		va5ceo
		vacu1
		v4ad
		3vag3a
		va4ge
		4vaged
		vager4
		vag5r
		v1al.
		1vale
		vali2
		va5lie
		val4ise
		5valu
		5val4v
		vam4i
		va5mo
		5vann
		vanta4
		4vantl
		var4is
		4vase
		vas5el5
		v5a4so
		vast3a
		v4at.
		5vatee
		vat4ina
		4vatu
		2ve.
		vect4
		ve3g
		3vei
		2vel
		vel3at
		4vele
		v3eler
		ve5line
		v1ell
		v4ella
		vel5ler
		vel3li
		vel5opi
		ven4al
		ven4do
		ve1ne
		ve5nia
		vent5o
		ven4tr
		4venu
		v5en5ue
		5ve3o
		5verb
		verde5v
		4v4ere4
		ver5ea
		ver3ei
		v5erie
		ver3m4
		ver4ne
		5verse
		4ves.
		4vi.
		5vialit
		vi4atr
		vi1b4
		vic2
		vi4ca
		vi5cari
		vice3r
		5vict2
		5vicu
		5vider
		vign3
		vi4l
		vil3i
		3vili4a
		v5ilise
		v5ilize
		vil5lin
		vim4
		5vime
		2v1in
		vin4ac
		3vinci
		vin2e
		5vinit
		v5iniz
		vint4
		vin5ta
		3vi1o
		viol3
		vi5om
		5vi3p
		vire4
		vi5rid
		vir3u
		5visecti
		5visio
		v3ism
		2v5ist
		vi2t
		vit2a
		vi3tal
		vi5tel
		v5itie
		vit1r
		vi3tu
		v3ity
		viv5al
		viv5or
		vi5zo
		1vo
		2vo.
		vo2l
		vo5litio
		vol4ubi
		volv4
		4von
		vo5rac
		3vorc
		4vore
		3voro
		vo3tar
		2vow
		vr4
		v5ra4
		v5ri
		v5ro
		vrot4
		4vs
		v3ure
		2vv2
		v5ver
		v5vi
		4vy
		4wab
		wag3o
		wais4
		w3al.
		wall5er
		w3als
		wan5gli
		wank5er
		war5ded
		ward5er
		ward5r
		war4f
		war4te
		war5thi
		wass4
		was4t
		wa1te
		wav4ine
		w1b4
		w4bon
		w5c
		w5die
		w3dr
		we4b
		w4ed
		3weed
		5wei
		weight5i
		weir4
		wel3i
		weliz4
		wel4izi
		wel4li
		went4
		wes4
		west3
		w5est.
		w5f
		wh2
		w5hid
		wi2
		wid4e
		wi5er
		will5in
		wim2p
		win2e
		wing5er
		win4tr
		3w4ise
		with5eri
		w3la
		wl1er
		wl1i
		wl4ie
		w1m
		1wo
		wol4
		wol5ver
		3wom
		won2t
		word5i
		wotch4
		woun4
		wp5in
		wra4
		ws5ing
		w5ster
		wt4
		w5te
		w3to
		wy2
		wz4
		x1a
		x4ach
		x4ade
		x2ag
		x3agg
		xa5met
		x3ami
		xan5d
		xano4
		x2as
		xas5p
		x3c4
		xcav3
		xcor5
		xe4
		x1ec
		xec3r
		xe5cutio
		xecut5o
		xe2d
		x5edl
		x5edn
		x5eg
		x1em
		x3en
		xen4op
		x3er
		xer4g
		xer3o
		x1h
		xhort4a
		x1i
		x3ia.
		x4ias
		xi4c
		x5ige
		xim3a
		x4ime
		ximet4
		x3io
		xi4p
		x4it.
		x4its
		x1o
		x4ode
		x5om
		xo4mat
		xo4n
		x4os
		xotrop4
		x3p
		xpel4
		xpo5n2
		xpoun4
		x1s2
		x1t2
		x4ted
		xtens5o
		xter3i
		xter4m3
		xtern3
		x4th
		xti4
		xtra5d
		xtra3v
		xtre4
		xu4o
		x1ur
		xur4b
		x5us
		x5w
		xx4
		xys4
		xy3t
		y1a2
		y5ac
		1y2ar
		3yard
		yas4i
		4y1b
		yb2i
		yca5m
		y5chede
		ych5is
		y3cho
		y4chose
		yc1l
		yclam4
		y4coli
		y4coll
		ycom4
		y2cos
		y1d4
		yda4
		yder4
		ydro5s
		y4drou
		y3ee
		yel5o
		y3en
		y1er
		y3est.
		yes5te
		y5ett
		y5f
		y1g
		ygi2
		ygi5a
		y3gl
		ygo4i
		y1h
		y1i
		y3in
		yle2
		ylin5de
		yllab5i
		yl3os
		yl5ou
		y1me4
		y3men
		y5met
		y5mia
		ym5in
		ymot4
		ym4pha
		yn1
		ynago4
		ynand5
		yn5ap4
		yn5ast
		yn4ci
		ynd4
		yn2e
		yn3er
		yng4
		yn4gol
		yni4c
		yn4y
		y1o2
		yo3d
		yo4gis
		youn4
		young5
		2yp
		yp5al
		yper3
		y5pere
		y4peri
		y4pero
		y4pet
		y2ph
		yph4e
		yph3i
		y4p1i
		yp1n
		ypo1
		y4pox
		y2pr
		yp5ri
		yp4si
		yp5syf
		ypt3a
		y5pu
		y3rag
		yr3at
		yr3ic
		y5rig
		yr3is
		yr3i4t
		yr5olo
		yr4r
		yr4s
		yr5u
		4y2s
		ys5ag
		ys5at
		y3s2c
		y3sh
		ys1ic
		ys3in
		ysi4o
		yso5
		ys4so
		ys1t
		ys4to
		y3u
		yv4
		y3w
		yz5er
		yzy4
		z1a1
		2za.
		za4bi
		za2i
		z4as
		za4te
		zd4
		zeb4
		ze4d
		zen4a
		z5eng
		zer5a
		z3et4
		z1i
		zib5
		5zic4
		z2ie
		zi5m
		zin4c3i
		z3ing
		zing5i
		z4is
		3zlem
		z3ler
		z3li
		4zo.
		5zoa
		zo3an
		3zoo2
		zo3ol
		zo3on
		zo5op
		zo5oti
		zo5p
		zot2
		z5s
		5zum
		4zy.
		zz2
		z3zar
		z5zas
		z3zie
		zzo3
		z5zot
	</patterns>
</hyphenation-info>
